Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.605

District schools may be used for teacher training by universities and The Evergreen State College—Agreement for financing, organization, etc.

The financing and the method of organization and administration of such a training program operated by agreement between a state university board of regents or a regional university board of trustees or The Evergreen State College board of trustees, and the board of directors of any school district, shall be determined by agreement between them.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 28; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.605. Prior: 1949 c 182 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4543-41. Formerly RCW 28.76.360.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.